Utah statutes.
77-21-4.   Fees.
Whenever a judge of a court of record of this state issues a certificate under
the provisions of this chapter to obtain the attendance of a witness for the
prosecution from without the state in a criminal prosecution or grand jury
investigation commenced or about to commence he shall designate therein a
suitable peace officer of this state to present the certificate to the proper
officer or tribunal of the state wherein the witness is found and to tender to
the witness his per diem and mileage fees.
The officer shall exhibit the certificate to the county auditor of the county
in which the criminal proceeding is pending and the auditor shall draw his
warrant upon the county treasurer in favor of the officer in the amount to be
tendered the witness. The officer shall be liable upon his official bond for
the proper disposition of the money received.
In all cases in which the officer is required to travel in order to present
the certificate and tender fees, his actual and necessary traveling expenses
shall be paid out of the fund from which witnesses for the prosecution in the
criminal proceeding are paid.
